Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1816.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 4, article 5, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-492, to read: START_STATUTE15-492. Optimal square footage; election eligibility Notwithstanding section 15-491, if the ratio of a school district's optimal square footage to actual square footage of all buildings that are owned by the school district, as calculated pursuant to section 41-5702.01, is at least one hundred ten percent, the school district governing board may not Call an election to either: 1. Determine whether bonds of the school district may be issued and sold. 2. Change the list of capital projects or the purposes authorized by prior voter approval to issue bonds. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 41, chapter 56, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-5702.01, to read: START_STATUTE41-5702.01. School district buildings; optimal square footage; posting; notification A. On or before _____ of each year, the board shall calculate the optimal square footage for each school district in this state based on the number of students served by the school district and grade configurations prescribed in section 41-5711, subsection C. For the purpose of calculating the number of students served by the school district, the board shall use the sum of the following: 1. The most recent average daily membership data for the school district. 2. If a school district leases a building or a portion of a building to a charter school or private school, the student capacity of the building or the portion of the building.  The board may include the student capacity of a leased building or portion of a building pursuant to this paragraph only after verifying the lease.  The board shall include the full student capacity of a leased building or portion of a building pursuant to this paragraph without regard to whether the lease grants to the lessee exclusive rights to use the school building or school facilities that are the subject of the lease. B. On or before _____ of each year, the board shall: 1. Post on the board's website both of the following: (a) The optimal square footage for each school district in this state calculated pursuant to subsection A of this section. (b) The ratio of each school district's optimal square footage to actual square footage of all buildings that are owned by the school district. 2. Submit to each county school superintendent and county board of supervisors a notification that: (a) Identifies each school district in this state for which the ratio calculated pursuant to paragraph 1, subdivision (b) of this subsection is at least one hundred ten percent. (b) Includes a statement that any school district that is identified pursuant to subdivision (a) of this paragraph is ineligible to call a bond election pursuant to title 15, chapter 4, article 5.  END_STATUTE